Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1817
Act and grants of power; how construed.

The Public Entities Mandated Project Charges Act and all grants of power and authority in the act shall be liberally construed to effectuate their purpose, and all incidental powers necessary to carry into effect the provisions of the act are expressly granted to and conferred upon public entities.

Laws 2006, LB 548, § 17.